Alabama, session 2026rs, SB216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Page 1

BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
SB216 INTRODUCED
29 Section 1. Section 31-2-41, Code of Alabama 1975, is
30 amended to read as follows:
31 "§31-2-41
32 (a) The Governor may present, at the expense of the
33 state, the following military awards to persons meeting the
34 respective requirements for each award. Each award may be
35 awarded posthumously. Concurrence of the Adjutant General
36 shall be required to present an award unless initiated by the
37 Governor. Recommendations for an award shall contain complete
38 factual information, including dates, as to the service or act
39 for which the award is recommended, with an appropriate
40 proposed citation:
41 (1) Governor's Cross. The Governor's Cross of Alabama
42 is the highest award. The award is presented for exceptional,
43 distinguished, and heroic military or civilian service in
44 support of military or domestic operations to the state.
45 Recipients shall have exhibited exceptional service through
46 personal acts of courage, bravery, or selfless service to the
47 state, including individuals who distinguish themselves by
48 conspicuously and voluntarily exhibiting a high degree of
49 courage or heroism by risking serious personal injury or death
50 in an attempt to save another individual whose life is in
51 danger during a military or training exercise.
52 (2) Distinguished Service Medal. The Distinguished
53 Service Medal of Alabama is the second highest award. The
54 award is presented for exceptional meritorious and
55 distinguished military or civilian service in support of
56 military operations for individuals serving in positions of
Page 2

military operations for individuals serving in positions of
SB216 INTRODUCED
57 great responsibility during times of war or peace.
58 (3) Alabama Commendation Medal. The Alabama
59 Commendation Medal is the third highest award. The award is
60 presented for meritorious and outstanding services and
61 accomplishments. The service may be military performance of
62 duty in time of war or peace. The medal may be awarded to
63 foreign military or civilian personnel who distinguish
64 themselves in a mutually beneficial manner to both the state
65 and the nation.
66 (b) The Adjutant General may present, at the expense of
67 the state, the following military awards to persons meeting
68 the respective requirements for each award. Each award may be
69 awarded posthumously. Recommendations for an award shall
70 contain complete factual information, including dates, as to
71 the service or act for which the award is recommended, with an
72 appropriate proposed citation:
73 (1) Exceptional Service Ribbon. The Exceptional Service
74 Ribbon of Alabama is the fourth highest award. The award is
75 presented to members of the Alabama National Guard who have
76 served an aggregate of 30 days in the state active service for
77 meritorious and outstanding service during times of state
78 emergencies in the support of upholding the law and preserving
79 order, protecting lives and property, and in the relief of
80 civilians in disaster and similar service ordered by the
81 Governor.
82 (2) Faithful Service Ribbon of Alabama. The award is
83 presented toAny any present or former officer, warrant
84 officer, or enlisted man member of the Alabama National Guard
Page 3

officer, or enlisted man member of the Alabama National Guard
SB216 INTRODUCED
85 who shall have has faithfully served in the National Guard or
86 Naval Militia for an aggregate of six years., shall have
87 conferred upon him the right to wear the Faithful Service
88 Cross, which shall be awarded by order of the Governor and
89 furnished at the expense of the state. Any officer, warrant
90 officer, or enlisted man of the National Guard or Naval
91 Militia of this state who shall have served an aggregate of 30
92 days in the active military service of the state, in the aid
93 of civil authorities in upholding the law and preserving
94 order, protecting lives and property, in the aid and relief of
95 citizens in disaster and other similar service, duly ordered
96 by the Governor, shall have conferred upon him the right to
97 wear the Special Service Medal, which shall be awarded by
98 order of the Governor and furnished at the expense of the
99 state. Any officer, warrant officer, or enlisted man of the
100 National Guard or the Naval Militia of this state who shall
101 have faithfully served in the National Guard or Naval Militia
102 of this state an aggregate of 20 years, shall have conferred
103 upon him the right to wear the Veterans Service Medal, which
104 shall be awarded by order of the Governor and furnished at the
105 expense of the state. Service in the organizations of the
106 National Guard or Naval Militia called, drafted, or ordered
107 into the service of the United States shall be credited as
108 active service in the National Guard or Naval Militia of this
109 state for the purposes named in this section, when the soldier
110 or sailor is a member of the National Guard or Naval Militia
111 on the date of federal call, draft, or order, and this
112 provision shall be retroactive so as to include service in any
Page 4

provision shall be retroactive so as to include service in any
SB216 INTRODUCED
113 war or during acts of hostility. The Special Service Medal may
114 also be awarded for such special individual acts as the
115 Military Advisory Board may determine to be meritorious and
116 the Governor may approve, without regard to the period of time
117 involved or the date of the act A bronze St. Andrews Cross
118 shall be added to the award for each additional three years
119 served beyond six years to denote the total number of years
120 served by the member.
121 (3) Phenix City Civil Disturbance Medal of Alabama. The
122 award is presented for military duty or civilian service that
123 contributed to the overall effort during the Phenix City civil
124 disturbance that occurred from June 18, 1954 to January 17,
125 1955.
126 (4) Operation Desert Storm Ribbon. The award is
127 presented to members of the Alabama National Guard activated
128 on Title 10 orders who served in direct support of Operation
129 Desert Storm or Operation Desert Shield for at least 30 days.
130 Service members who worked on special duty preparing units for
131 mobilization are not eligible for the award.
132 (5) National Emergency Service Ribbon of Alabama. The
133 award includes the Berlin Crisis Clasp and 9-11 Clasp. The
134 Berlin Crisis Clasp is presented to members of the Alabama
135 National Guard called into active federal service during the
136 Berlin Crisis National Emergency, pursuant to Public Law
137 87-117, and Presidential Executive Order 10957, dated August
138 15, 1961. The 9-11 Clasp is presented to members of the
139 Alabama National Guard called to active federal service under
140 Title 10, United States Code for Operation Noble Eagle, Iraqi
Page 5

Title 10, United States Code for Operation Noble Eagle, Iraqi
SB216 INTRODUCED
141 Freedom, or Enduring Freedom for a minimum of 24 hours in
142 support thereof.
143 (6) Veterans Service Medal of Alabama. The award is
144 presented to members of the Alabama National Guard who have
145 served an aggregate of 21 years in active service, including
146 constructive service in organizations of the National Guard
147 while ordered into the federal service. Qualifying service
148 does not include constructive service in any Reserve
149 Component, except the National Guard. A bronze oak leaf
150 cluster shall be added to the award for each three additional
151 years served beyond 21 years to denote the total number of
152 years served by the member.
153 (7) Special Service Ribbon of Alabama. The award is
154 presented to members of the Alabama National Guard who have
155 served an aggregate of 30 days in the state active service for
156 meritorious and outstanding service during times of state
157 emergencies in the support of upholding the law and preserving
158 order, protecting lives and property, and in the relief of
159 civilians in disaster and similar service ordered by the
160 Governor.
161 (8) First Sergeant Service Ribbon. The award is
162 presented to a First Sergeant, Special Duty Identifier 8F000,
163 in recognition of meritorious service who has been assigned to
164 a First Sergeant Unit Manning Position for at least three
165 years and has attended the United States Air Force or Air
166 National Guard First Sergeant Academy. Acting First Sergeants
167 are not eligible for the award.
168 (9) Honor Guard Service Ribbon. The award is presented
Page 6

(9) Honor Guard Service Ribbon. The award is presented
SB216 INTRODUCED
169 to all members of the Alabama Army and Air National Guard who
170 perform military funeral honors and who satisfy all Honor
171 Guard expectations, including completion of the requisite
172 number of funeral details.
173 (10) Alabama National Guard Recruiting Ribbon. The
174 award is presented to members of the Alabama National Guard
175 who have excelled as a production recruiter and who meet the
176 qualifications set by the State Military Department.
177 (11) Alabama National Guard Recruiting Lead Generation
178 Ribbon. The award is presented to members of the Alabama
179 National Guard who are not assigned or employed with the
180 Recruiting and Retention Unit in recognition of excellence in
181 recruiting as determined by the State Military Department.
182 (12) Basic Training Ribbon of Alabama. The award is
183 presented to members of the Alabama National Guard who have
184 successfully completed the Basic Training Course after the
185 year 1955.
186 (13) Certificate of Appreciation. The award is
187 presented for domestic and foreign military and civilian
188 persons whose acts of good public and community relations were
189 in the interest of and support the State Military Department.
190 (14) Certificate of Extension. The award is presented
191 to members of the Alabama National Guard for each extension of
192 three years or more after his or her initial term for faithful
193 and honorable service."
194 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
195 1, 2026.
Page 7